Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 7.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8907
Human legend drug, defined.

Human legend drug means any drug labeled for human use and required by federal law or regulation to be dispensed pursuant to a prescription, including finished dosage forms and active ingredients. Human legend drug does not include a device or a device component, part, or accessory.

Laws 2008, LB1022, § 7.